Hawaii statutes.
§515-3 Discriminatory practices. It is
a discriminatory practice for an owner or any other person engaging in a real
estate transaction, or for a real estate broker or salesperson, because of
race, sex, including gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, color,
religion, marital status, familial status, ancestry, disability, age, or human
immunodeficiency virus infection:

(1) To refuse to engage in a real estate transaction
with a person;

(2) To discriminate against a person in the terms,
conditions, or privileges of a real estate transaction or in the furnishing of
facilities or services in connection with a real estate transaction;

(3) To refuse to receive or to fail to transmit a
bona fide offer to engage in a real estate transaction from a person;

(4) To refuse to negotiate for a real estate
transaction with a person;

(5) To represent to a person that real property is
not available for inspection, sale, rental, or lease when in fact it is
available, or to fail to bring a property listing to the person's attention, or
to refuse to permit the person to inspect real property, or to steer a person
seeking to engage in a real estate transaction;

(6) To offer, solicit, accept, use, or retain a
listing of real property with the understanding that a person may be
discriminated against in a real estate transaction or in the furnishing of
facilities or services in connection with a real estate transaction;

[(7)] To solicit or require as a condition of engaging
in a real estate transaction that the buyer, renter, or lessee be tested for
human immunodeficiency virus infection, the causative agent of acquired
immunodeficiency syndrome;

[(8)] To refuse to permit, at the expense of a person
with a disability, reasonable modifications to existing premises occupied or to
be occupied by the person if modifications may be necessary to afford the
person full enjoyment of the premises; provided that a real estate broker or
salesperson, where it is reasonable to do so, may condition permission for a
modification on the person agreeing to restore the interior of the premises to
the condition that existed before the modification, reasonable wear and tear
excepted;

[(9)] To refuse to make reasonable accommodations in
rules, policies, practices, or services, when the accommodations may be
necessary to afford a person with a disability equal opportunity to use and
enjoy a housing accommodation; provided that if reasonable accommodations
include the use of an animal, reasonable restrictions may be imposed;

[(10)] In connection with the design and construction of
covered multifamily housing accommodations for first occupancy after March 13,
1991, to fail to design and construct housing accommodations in such a manner
that:

(A) The housing accommodations have at least
one accessible entrance, unless it is impractical to do so because of the
terrain or unusual characteristics of the site; and

(B) With respect to housing accommodations
with an accessible building entrance:

(i) The public use and common use portions of
the housing accommodations are accessible to and usable by persons with
disabilities;

(ii) Doors allow passage by persons in
wheelchairs; and

(iii) All premises within covered multifamily
housing accommodations contain an accessible route into and through the housing
accommodations; light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats, and other
environmental controls are in accessible locations; reinforcements in the
bathroom walls allow installation of grab bars; and kitchens and bathrooms are
accessible by wheelchair; or

[(11)] To discriminate against or deny a person access
to, or membership or participation in any multiple listing service, real estate
broker's organization, or other service, organization, or facility involved
either directly or indirectly in real estate transactions, or to discriminate
against any person in the terms or conditions of access, membership, or
participation. [L 1967, c 193, §3; HRS §515-3; am L 1971, c 124, §1; am L 1975,
c 109, §5; am L 1976, c 159, §4; am L 1984, c 105, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1987,
c 365, §1 and c 370, §1; am L 1989, c 391, §2; am L 1990, c 67, §8 and c 275,
§3; am L 1991, c 178, §2; am L 1992, c 33, §4 and c 171, §3; am L 1993, c 140,
§2; am L 1997, c 311, §1; am L 2005, c 214, §3; am L 2011, c 31, §2 and c 175, §8]

Case Notes

While this section
does not explicitly mention emotional support animals, it invites the possibility of their acceptance within the
broad limitation of "use of an animal". Plaintiff's motion denied to
the extent that it sought summary judgment declaring that before it was
required to grant a waiver of its no pet policy pursuant to a reasonable
accommodation request, it could require that the animal have received some
individual training. 892 F. Supp. 2d 1268 (2012).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next